Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.760

Child care and early learning providers—Firearms, dangerous weapons.

(1) Every child day care center and early childhood education and assistance program provider is subject to RCW 9.41.282.

(2)(a) A family day care provider must store any firearm, ammunition, or other dangerous weapon as described in RCW 9.41.250 in a secure area when children for whom the family day care provider is licensed to provide care are present on the premises.

(b) The secure area must be inaccessible to children and must consist of a locked gun safe or a locked room. If stored in a locked room, each firearm must be stored unloaded and with a trigger lock or other disabling feature.

(3) The department may deny, suspend, revoke, modify or not renew the license of a child care provider in violation of this section.

[ 2020 c 189 s 2.]